Oklahoma, session 2025, SB1122.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2808, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2808. A. As used in the Ad Valorem Tax Code:


1. “Public service corporation” means all transportation


companies, transmission companies, all gas, electric, light, heat,


and power companies, and all waterworks and water power companies,


and all persons authorized to exercise the right of eminent domain


or to use or occupy any right-of-way, street, alley, or public



Req. No. 1206 Page 1


highway, along, over, or under the same in a manner not permitted to


the general public;


2. “Transportation company” means any company, corporation,


trustee, receiver, or any other person owning, leasing, or operating


for hire, a street railway, canal, steamboat line, and also any


sleeping car company, parlor car company, and express company, and


any other company, trustee, or person in any way engaged in such


business as a common carrier. As used in the Ad Valorem Tax Code,


the term “transportation company” transportation company shall not


include any railroad or any air carrier. However, all railroad and


air carrier property shall continue to be valued and assessed by the


State Board of Equalization for purposes of ad valorem taxation;


3. “Transmission company” means any company, corporation,


trustee, receiver, or other person owning, leasing, or operating for


hire any telegraph or telephone line or radio broadcasting system;


4. “Person” means individuals, partnerships, associations, and


corporations in the singular as well as plural number;


5. “Video services provider” means a subclass of public service


corporations consisting of any public service corporation offering


video programming services;


6. “Video programming” shall have the same meaning as set forth


in 47 U.S.C., Section 522(20); and


7. “Fixed wireless broadband Internet service provider” means


an entity that solely offers access to the Internet through a

Req. No. 1206 Page 2


stationary fixed point-to-point connection often requiring direct


line of sight between the provider’s wireless transmitter and its


end-user consumer’s receiver; and


8. “Broadband service providers” means a subclass of public


service corporations consisting of any public service corporation


offering broadband-based services including Internet access, Voice


over Internet Protocol, or Internet Protocol television to end-user


consumers. For the purposes of this paragraph, “broadband” means


wired internet at speeds in excess of one hundred megabits per


second (100 Mbps) for download and twenty megabits per second (20


Mbps) for upload.


B. As used in the Ad Valorem Tax Code, “transmission company”


transmission company and “public service corporation” public service


corporation shall not be construed to include cable television


companies or fixed wireless broadband Internet service providers.


C. Any real or personal property used by any company,


corporation, trustee, receiver, or other person owning, leasing, or


operating for hire any pipeline or oil or gas gathering system which


was assessed by the State Board of Equalization after January 1,


1997, shall continue to be assessed by the State Board of


Equalization through ad valorem tax year 1998.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2847, is


amended to read as follows:



Req. No. 1206 Page 3


Section 2847. A. The property of all railroads, air carriers,


and public service corporations shall be assessed annually by the


State Board of Equalization at its fair cash value estimated at the


price it would bring at a fair voluntary sale.


B. Taxable values of real and personal property of all


railroads, air carriers, and public service corporations shall be


established in accordance with the requirements of Section 8 of


Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution. The State Board of


Equalization shall determine the taxable value of all taxable


property that the Board is required by law to assess and value, and


shall determine such taxable value in accordance with the


requirements of Section 8 of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution.


C. The State Board of Equalization shall assess the property of


that subclass of public service corporations known as video services


providers, as defined in Section 2808 of this title, as provided:


1. Every video services provider shall file with the State


Board of Equalization a certification regarding total gross receipts


for the immediate preceding calendar year by April 15 and shall


specify the total gross receipts derived from video programming


services;


2. The State Board of Equalization shall determine the


percentage of gross receipts the video services provider has derived


from video programming in the immediately preceding calendar year;


and

Req. No. 1206 Page 4


3. The percentage determined pursuant to paragraph 2 of this


subsection shall be applied to the taxable fair cash value allocated


to Oklahoma this state, and the resulting fair cash value


attributable to video programming services shall be assessed using


the statewide average of the assessment ratios applied to the assets


of cable television companies in that tax year. Unless the taxpayer


or the State Board of Equalization demonstrates otherwise, the


statewide average assessment ratio applied to the personal property


of a cable television company shall be assumed to be twelve percent


(12%).


D. The percentage of fair cash value for real and personal


property of railroads, air carriers, and public service corporations


required by the Oklahoma Constitution to be taxable shall be the


percentage at which it was assessed on January 1, 1996, in


accordance with the provisions of paragraph 3 of subsection A of


Section 8 of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution, and, subject to


the requirements of federal law, shall be uniformly applied to


calculate the taxable values of public service corporation property


within the state for the applicable assessment year.


E. The State Board of Equalization shall assess the property


used to provide wired broadband service that is constructed or


installed and placed in service after the effective date of this


act, in an area where the coverage for wired internet at speeds in


excess of one hundred megabits per second (100 Mbps) for download

Req. No. 1206 Page 5


and twenty megabits per second (20 Mbps) for upload is equal to or


less than ten percent (10%) according to the most recent FCC


National Broadband Map published by the Federal Communications


Commission at the time the property is constructed or installed and


placed in service, of that subclass of public service corporations


known as broadband service providers, as defined in Section 2808 of


this title, at a ratio of fifteen percent (15%) for tax years 2026


through 2036. Provided, the property assessed pursuant to this


subsection shall only include property exclusively used to provide


broadband internet service to areas meeting the coverage


requirements as provided in this subsection including fiber, cable,


transmission lines, fiber support infrastructure, cable support


infrastructure, transmission line support infrastructure, network


infrastructure, and facilities used to contain network


infrastructure. The valuation of all assets shall be calculated on


a net book basis to each assessment rate as provided in this


subsection and subsection D of this section. The Oklahoma Tax


Commission may promulgate rules to effectuate the provisions of this


subsection.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective January 1, 2026.




60-1-1206 QD 1/16/2025 3:54:55 PM





Req. No. 1206 Page 6